Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-110
Banks; bonds; filing; approval; requirements; open to inspection.

The department shall require each bank to obtain a fidelity bond, naming the bank as obligee, in an amount to be fixed by the director. The bond shall be issued by an authorized insurer and shall be conditioned to protect and indemnify the bank from loss which it may sustain, of money or other personal property, including that for which the bank is responsible through or by reason of the fraud, dishonesty, forgery, theft, embezzlement, wrongful abstraction, misapplication, misappropriation, or any other dishonest or criminal act of or by any of its officers or employees. Such bond may contain a deductible clause in an amount to be approved by the director. An executed copy of the bond shall be filed with and approved by the director and shall remain a part of the records of the department. The director may provide for such copies to be filed electronically. If the premium of the bond is not paid, the bond shall not be canceled or subject to cancellation unless at least ten days' advance notice, in writing, is filed with the department. No bond which is current with respect to premium payments shall be canceled or subject to cancellation unless at least forty-five days' advance notice, in writing, is filed with the department. The bond shall be open to public inspection during the office hours of the department. In the event a bond is canceled, the director may take whatever action he or she deems appropriate in connection with the continued operation of the bank involved.

C.S.1929, § 8-103;

Laws 1930, Spec. Sess., c. 6, § 13, p. 32;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 6, p. 137;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-103;

R.S.1943, § 8-106;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 10, p. 138;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 220, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 653, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 11.

Each executive officer of a state bank is required by this section to give a surety bond to protect it from pecuniary loss sustained by it through forbidden acts committed directly by him or by connivance with others. Luikart v. Flannigan, 130 Neb. 901, 267 N.W. 165 (1936).